Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 1. Registration.

Administrative Code. —

For contractor registration, see 12 AAC 21, art. 1.

For home inspector registration, see 12 AAC 22, art. 1.

Sec. 08.18.010.
Creation and composition of board. [Repealed, § 1 ch 100 SLA 1968.]

Sec. 08.18.011.
Registration required.

A person may not submit a bid or work as a contractor until that person has been issued a certificate of registration as a contractor by the department. A partnership or joint venture shall be considered registered as a contractor if one of the general partners or venturers whose name appears in the name under which the partnership or venture does business is registered as a contractor.

A general contractor may not use a bid or proposal from, award a bid or proposal to, contract with, or allow a person required to be registered under this chapter to work for the general contractor as a specialty contractor unless the person is registered as a specialty contractor under this chapter.

Unless exempt under AS

08.18.156

or serving lawfully as an associate home inspector under (d) of this section, an individual may not perform a home inspection for a residence

not previously occupied as a residence unless that individual is registered as a home inspector for new homes under this chapter;

previously occupied as a residence unless that individual is registered as a home inspector for existing homes under this chapter.

Notwithstanding (c) of this section, an individual who is not registered as a home inspector under this chapter may perform a home inspection as an associate home inspector if the individual is

employed by a registered home inspector who supervises the associate’s work and the inspection is of the type that the supervising individual is authorized to perform; and

registered with the department as an associate home inspector.

A registered home inspector who employs an associate home inspector under (d) of this section is liable for the work done by the associate home inspector.

An individual who holds a joint registration for home inspection is considered to be registered as both a home inspector for new homes and a home inspector for existing homes.

History.

(§ 2 ch 100 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 83 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 163 SLA 1988; am §§ 4, 5 ch 134 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For registration, see 12 AAC 21, art. 1.

Sec. 08.18.013.
Categories of contractors.

The department may adopt regulations establishing categories of contractors and the registration or endorsement requirements for persons in those categories.

History.

(§ 2 ch 99 SLA 1990)

Sec. 08.18.020.
Qualifications of members. [Repealed, § 1 ch 100 SLA 1968.]

Sec. 08.18.021.
Application for registration.

An applicant for registration as a contractor or home inspector shall submit an application under oath upon a form to be prescribed by the commissioner and that must include the following information pertaining to the applicant:

the applicant’s social security number;

if applying to be a registered contractor, the type of contracting activity, whether a general or a specialty contractor and, if the latter, the type of specialty;

if applying to be a registered home inspector, whether the applicant is applying to inspect new homes or existing homes, or both;

if applying to be a registered contractor, the name and address of each partner if the applicant is a firm or partnership, or the name and address of the owner if the applicant is an individual proprietorship, or the name and address of the corporate officers and statutory agent, if any, if the applicant is a corporation; and

if applying to be a registered home inspector, the name and address of the applicant.

The information contained in the application shall be a matter of public record and open to public inspection.

History.

(§ 2 ch 100 SLA 1968; am § 6 ch 134 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For registration, see 12 AAC 21, art. 1.

For specialty contractor trades, see 12 AAC 21, art. 2.

For mechanical contractor, see 12 AAC 21, art. 3.

For registration, see 12 AAC 22, art. 1.

Sec. 08.18.022.
Home inspectors; associate home inspectors.

The department shall issue a certificate of registration as a home inspector for new homes, existing homes, or both, as appropriate, to an individual who

passes the appropriate home inspection examination; for purposes of this paragraph, the appropriate home inspection examination for an individual who applies to be registered for inspection of

existing homes is the examination offered by the American Society of Home Inspectors or National Association of Home Inspectors;

new homes or for a joint registration is the examination offered by the International Code Council;

meets the educational and experience requirements adopted by the department in regulations for the type of registration applied for;

submits a complete application for registration either

within three years after passing the examination required under (1) of this subsection; or

accompanied by documentation that the applicant has completed continuing education requirements established by the department;

within the seven years preceding the date of application, has not been under a sentence for an offense related to forgery, theft in the first or second degree, extortion, or defrauding creditors or for a felony involving dishonesty;

has not had the authority to perform home inspections revoked in this state or in another jurisdiction;

is not the subject of an unresolved criminal complaint or unresolved disciplinary action before a regulatory authority in this state or in another jurisdiction related to real estate or home inspection matters; and

pays the appropriate fees.

An individual may register with the department as an associate home inspector upon application, payment of the required fee, and determination by the department that the individual

within the seven years preceding the date of application, has not been under a sentence for an offense related to forgery, theft in the first or second degree, extortion, or defrauding creditors or for a felony involving dishonesty;

has not had the authority to perform home inspections revoked in this state or in another jurisdiction; and

is not the subject of an unresolved criminal complaint or unresolved disciplinary action before a regulatory authority in this state or in another jurisdiction related to real estate or home inspection matters.

History.

(§ 7 ch 134 SLA 2003; am § 2 ch 106 SLA 2004)

Editor’s notes. —

The National Association of Home Inspectors (NAHI) went out of business in 2016. At that time NAHI announced that NAHI members would become members of the American Society of Home Inspectors.

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For registration, see 12 AAC 22, art. 1.

Sec. 08.18.023.
Pre-inspection documents and inspection reports.

Before performing a home inspection, a registered home inspector or associate home inspector shall provide to the person on whose behalf a home is inspected a written document that includes the home inspector’s registration number and that specifies

the scope of intended inspection; the scope of the intended inspection may include systems and components that are not listed in AS

08.18.171

(8); and

that the inspector will notify in writing the person on whose behalf the inspection is being made of defects noted during the inspection along with a recommendation, if any, that experts be retained to conduct further evaluation through examination and analysis by a qualified professional, tradesperson, or service technician beyond that provided by the home inspection to determine the extent of defects and corrective action necessary to address the defects.

After performance of a home inspection, a registered home inspector or associate home inspector shall give a written home inspection report to the person requesting the inspection. The written report must include the home inspector’s registration number and a review of the condition of each system and component identified as being within the scope of the intended inspection under (a) of this section except that a home inspector’s written report for new construction that is the subject of a loan by the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation or another lender may be in the form required by the corporation or other lender, as appropriate.

In addition to the written inspection report required under (b) of this section, an oral inspection report may be given by the inspector during or after the inspection.

A home inspection report is valid for 180 days after the date the home inspector signs and dates the report.

History.

(§ 7 ch 134 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2003, in paragraph (a)(1), “AS § 08.18.171(8)” was substituted for “AS § 08.18.171(12)” to reflect the 2003 renumbering of AS § 08.18.171(12).

Cross references. —

For violation of (b) of this section as an unlawful trade practice, see AS

45.50.471(b)

.

Sec. 08.18.024.
Specialty contractors.

The department may authorize the limited use of specific construction techniques or materials that are defined by the department as part of one specialty trade by a specialty contractor licensed in a different specialty trade if those construction techniques or materials are a small but inseparable part of what is required to complete that specialty contractor’s work.

Notwithstanding (a) of this section, a specialty contractor may perform work that requires the use of not more than three trades.

History.

(§ 1 ch 121 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 144 SLA 2004; am § 1 ch 70 SLA 2014)

Administrative Code. —

For specialty contractor trades, see 12 AAC 21, art. 2.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective January 1, 2015, deleted (b)(2), which read “is exempt under AS 08.18.16(8)”, and made related changes.

Sec. 08.18.025.
Residential contractors.

A general contractor may not undertake the construction or alteration, or submit a bid to undertake the construction or alteration of a privately-owned residential structure of one to four units or advertise or publicly represent that the general contractor may undertake work of this type in the state without a residential contractor endorsement issued under this section. In this subsection, “alteration” means changes that have a value greater than 25 percent of the value of the structure being altered.

The department shall issue a residential contractor endorsement to a person who

has a certificate of registration as a general contractor;

passes a residential contractor examination, which shall be offered by the department at least once each year in each judicial district; the examination, which may be written or practical, may test competence in relation to arctic structural and thermal construction techniques and other matters as determined by the department in consultation with representatives of the construction industry;

applies for an endorsement within 12 months after passing the examination required under (2) of this subsection;

within the two years preceding the date of application for the endorsement, has satisfactorily completed either the Alaska craftsman home program sponsored by the department, or its equivalent, or a postsecondary course in arctic engineering, or its equivalent;

within the seven years preceding the date of application, has not been under a sentence for an offense related to forgery, theft in the first or second degree, extortion, or conspiracy to defraud creditors or for a felony involving dishonesty; and

pays the appropriate fees.

The department may not renew an endorsement issued under this section unless the applicant submits proof of continued competency relating to residential contracting that satisfies the department. A lapsed endorsement may be reinstated, within two years after the lapse, upon proof of continued competency, payment of a renewal fee for the intervening time period, and payment of any penalty fee established under AS

08.01.100(b)

. If the endorsement has been lapsed for more than two years, the department may not reinstate it until the person also passes the residential contractor examination described in (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 3 ch 99 SLA 1990; am § 1 ch 7 SLA 2002)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS

08.18.024

. Renumbered in 1990.

In 1999, in (b)(4) of this section, “Community and Economic Development” was substituted for “Community and Regional Affairs” to correct a manifest error in enactment by the omission of reference to AS

08.18.025(b)

in § 91(a)(1), ch. 58, SLA 1999.

In 2004, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development” in (b)(4) of this section, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Cross references. —

For transitional licensing provisions, see § 11, ch. 99, SLA 1990 in the Temporary and Special Acts; for temporary exemption with respect to work performed in communities with 2,500 or fewer residents, see § 12, ch. 99, SLA 1990 in the Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For residential contractor endorsement, see 12 AAC 21, art. 4.

Legislative history reports. —

For Senate letter of intent in connection with CS SSSB 72 (Fin), from which
ch. 99, SLA 1990, which enacted this section, derived, see 1990 Senate Journal 2449 and 2475.

Sec. 08.18.026.
Electrical contractors.

The department may not issue a certificate of registration as an electrical contractor to an applicant unless the applicant is, or employs, a person currently licensed as an electrical administrator under AS 08.40.

Each applicant for an electrical contractor’s certificate of registration may employ more than one electrical administrator.

If the relationship of the only electrical administrator with a registered electrical contractor is terminated, the registration is void 30 days after the next regularly scheduled examination unless the electrical contractor has hired a licensed electrical administrator in the interim.

History.

(§ 1 ch 53 SLA 1977)

Sec. 08.18.028.
Mechanical contractors.

The department may not issue a certificate of registration as a mechanical contractor to an applicant unless the applicant is, or employs, a person currently licensed as a mechanical administrator under AS 08.40.

Each applicant for a mechanical contractor’s certificate of registration may employ more than one mechanical administrator.

If the relationship of the only mechanical administrator with a registered mechanical contractor is terminated, the registration is void 30 days after the next regularly scheduled mechanical administrator’s examination unless the mechanical contractor has hired a licensed mechanical administrator in the interim.

History.

(§ 3 ch 132 SLA 1988)

Administrative Code. —

For mechanical contractor, see 12 AAC 21, art. 3.

Sec. 08.18.030.
Terms of office. [Repealed, § 1 ch 100 SLA 1968.]

Sec. 08.18.031.
Certificate of registration.

Except as provided in (c) of this section, a certificate of registration shall be renewed under the same requirements as for an original registration, and the commissioner shall issue to the applicant a certificate of registration upon compliance with the registration requirements of this chapter.

The commissioner may not issue a certificate of registration or renew the registration of an applicant whose registration has been revoked or suspended or against whom a fine has been imposed under this chapter until the period of revocation or suspension has expired and any fine has been paid.

A certificate of registration as a home inspector may not be renewed unless the home inspector has complied with the continuing competency requirements established by the department. The department shall adopt regulations establishing the continuing competency requirements. The department shall require at least eight hours of continuing competency activity for each licensing period. The regulations must provide that a continuing competency activity approved by one of the following entities satisfies the continuing competency requirements of this subsection if the activity meets the requirements established by the department in regulations adopted under this subsection:

Alaska Housing Finance Corporation;

University of Alaska;

American Society of Home Inspectors Alaska Chapter;

a chapter of the International Code Council Alaska;

Alaska State Home Building Association; or

a state agency that offers an activity that meets the requirements set by the department.

History.

(§ 2 ch 100 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 49 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 108 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 81 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 83 SLA 1985; am § 15 ch 94 SLA 1987; am §§ 8, 9 ch 134 SLA 2003)

Cross references. —

For certificate duration and renewal, see AS

08.01.100

.

Administrative Code. —

For registration, see 12 AAC 21, art. 1.

For renewal and reinstatement, see 12 AAC 22, art. 2.

For continuing competency requirements, see 12 AAC 22, art. 3.

Sec. 08.18.040.
Officers of board. [Repealed, § 1 ch 100 SLA 1968.]

Sec. 08.18.041.
Fees.

The department shall set fees under AS

08.01.065

for

registration and renewal of registration for all categories of contractors;

registration and renewal of registration for a home inspector qualified to inspect new homes;

registration and renewal of registration for a home inspector qualified to inspect existing homes;

joint registration and renewal of joint registration for home inspectors;

registration and renewal of registration as an associate home inspector;

examinations for applicants for home inspector registration;

examination, issuance of initial endorsement, and renewal of active or inactive endorsements for residential contractors; and

departmental publications and seminars related to this chapter.

A person who fails a residential contractor examination or home inspector examination shall pay the examination fee set by the department if the person applies to retake an examination.

History.

(§ 2 ch 100 SLA 1968; am § 2 ch 81 SLA 1984; am § 12 ch 37 SLA 1985; am § 4 ch 132 SLA 1988; am § 4 ch 99 SLA 1990; am § 10 ch 134 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For registration, see 12 AAC 22, art. 1.

For renewal and reinstatement, see 12 AAC 22, art. 2.

Sec. 08.18.050.
Meetings and quorum. [Repealed, § 1 ch 100 SLA 1968.]

Sec. 08.18.051.
Identification requirements for contractors.

Except as provided otherwise by law, a person who has registered as a contractor under one name as required by this chapter may not act in the capacity of a contractor under any other name unless that name also is registered.

All advertising, contracts, correspondence, cards, signs, posters, papers, and documents prepared by a contractor for the contracting business must show the contractor’s name, mailing address, and address of the contractor’s principal place of business. Advertising and contracts must also include the contractor’s registration number.

Individual contractors and partners, associates, agents, salesmen, solicitors, officers, and employees of contractors shall use their true names and addresses and the true name of the contractor firm at all times while acting in the capacity of a contractor or performing related activities.

History.

(§ 2 ch 100 SLA 1968; am § 3 ch 83 SLA 1985; am § 11 ch 134 SLA 2003)

Administrative Code. —

For registration, see 12 AAC 21, art. 1.

Sec. 08.18.053.
Identification requirements for home inspectors.

Except as provided otherwise by law, an individual who is registered as a home inspector or associate home inspector under this chapter by one name may not act in the capacity of a home inspector or associate home inspector under any other name.

All advertising and business cards prepared by a registered home inspector or associate home inspector for the home inspection business must show the inspector’s name, mailing address, and registration number.

Individual registered home inspectors and partners, associates, agents, salespeople, solicitors, officers, and employees of registered home inspectors shall use their true names and addresses and the true name of the home inspecting firm at all times while acting in the capacity of a registered home inspector or performing related activities.

Individuals who are exempt from registration under AS

08.18.156(a)

or whose actions are not considered to be home inspections under AS

08.18.156(b)

may not hold themselves out to be registered home inspectors or use words or titles that may reasonably be confused with the title of “registered home inspector” or “home inspector” unless they are registered as a home inspector under this chapter.

History.

(§ 12 ch 134 SLA 2003)

Sec. 08.18.060.
Executive director. [Repealed, § 1 ch 100 SLA 1968.]

Sec. 08.18.061.
Requirements of political subdivision.

A contractor or home inspector who is registered with the state under this chapter may not be required to give bond in applying for or holding a license issued by a political subdivision for a similar occupation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 100 SLA 1968; am § 13 ch 134 SLA 2003)

Sec. 08.18.070.
Expenses. [Repealed, § 1 ch 100 SLA 1968.]